Hawaii, session 2026, SB574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302L-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  The program shall serve three- and four-year-old children who are in the two years prior to kindergarten entry pursuant to section 302A-411, with priority extended to underserved or at-risk children, as defined in section 302L-1, and children having a parent or guardian who is a public school teacher. The program shall follow the academic year schedule of the department of education and be aligned with the full-day kindergarten classroom schedule of each school.  Enrollment priority for each school shall be given but is not limited to children who attend prekindergarten at schools to which the children will be assigned upon entering kindergarten under section 302A-1143[.] and children having a parent or guardian employed at the school as a teacher.  An application for a child to receive any form of priority under this subsection shall include evidence of parental or guardian ineligibility for the child care subsidy program and preschool open doors program, in a manner established by the executive office on early learning." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________